Illinois, session 104th, HB4798.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Section 9.15 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/9.15)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-458)8    Sec. 9.15. Greenhouse gases.9    (a) An air pollution construction permit shall not be 10required due to emissions of greenhouse gases if the 11equipment, site, or source is not subject to regulation, as 12defined by 40 CFR 52.21, as now or hereafter amended, for 13greenhouse gases or is otherwise not addressed in this Section 14or by the Board in regulations for greenhouse gases. These 15exemptions do not relieve an owner or operator from the 16obligation to comply with other applicable rules or 17regulations.18    (b) An air pollution operating permit shall not be 19required due to emissions of greenhouse gases if the 20equipment, site, or source is not subject to regulation, as 21defined by Section 39.5 of this Act, for greenhouse gases or is 22otherwise not addressed in this Section or by the Board in 23regulations for greenhouse gases. These exemptions do not   HB4798- 2 -LRB104 20250 TRT 33701 b1relieve an owner or operator from the obligation to comply 2with other applicable rules or regulations.3    (c) (Blank). 4    (d) (Blank).5    (e) (Blank). 6    (f) As used in this Section:7    "Carbon dioxide emission" means the plant annual CO2 total 8output emission as measured by the United States Environmental 9Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation Resource 10Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor. 11    "Carbon dioxide equivalent emissions" or "CO2e" means the 12sum total of the mass amount of emissions in tons per year, 13calculated by multiplying the mass amount of each of the 6 14greenhouse gases specified in Section 3.207, in tons per year, 15by its associated global warming potential as set forth in 40 16CFR 98, subpart A, table A-1 or its successor, and then adding 17them all together.18    "Cogeneration" or "combined heat and power" refers to any 19system that, either simultaneously or sequentially, produces 20electricity and useful thermal energy from a single fuel 21source.22    "Copollutants" refers to the 6 criteria pollutants that 23have been identified by the United States Environmental 24Protection Agency pursuant to the Clean Air Act.25    "Electric generating unit" or "EGU" means a fossil 26fuel-fired stationary boiler, combustion turbine, or combined   HB4798- 3 -LRB104 20250 TRT 33701 b1cycle system that serves a generator that has a nameplate 2capacity greater than 25 MWe and produces electricity for 3sale.4    "Environmental justice community" means the definition of 5that term based on existing methodologies and findings, used 6and as may be updated by the Illinois Power Agency and its 7program administrator in the Illinois Solar for All Program.8    "Equity investment eligible community" or "eligible 9community" means the geographic areas throughout Illinois that 10would most benefit from equitable investments by the State 11designed to combat discrimination and foster sustainable 12economic growth. Specifically, eligible community means the 13following areas:14        (1) areas where residents have been historically 15    excluded from economic opportunities, including 16    opportunities in the energy sector, as defined as R3 areas 17    pursuant to Section 10-40 of the Cannabis Regulation and 18    Tax Act; and19        (2) areas where residents have been historically 20    subject to disproportionate burdens of pollution, 21    including pollution from the energy sector, as established 22    by environmental justice communities as defined by the 23    Illinois Power Agency pursuant to the Illinois Power 24    Agency Act, excluding any racial or ethnic indicators.25    "Equity investment eligible person" or "eligible person" 26means the persons who would most benefit from equitable   HB4798- 4 -LRB104 20250 TRT 33701 b1investments by the State designed to combat discrimination and 2foster sustainable economic growth. Specifically, eligible 3person means the following people:4        (1) persons whose primary residence is in an equity 5    investment eligible community;6        (2) persons whose primary residence is in a 7    municipality, or a county with a population under 100,000, 8    where the closure of an electric generating unit or mine 9    has been publicly announced or the electric generating 10    unit or mine is in the process of closing or closed within 11    the last 5 years;12        (3) persons who are graduates of or currently enrolled 13    in the foster care system; or14        (4) persons who were formerly incarcerated.15    "Existing emissions" means: 16        (1) for CO2e, the total average tons-per-year of CO2e 17    emitted by the EGU or large GHG-emitting unit either in 18    the years 2018 through 2020 or, if the unit was not yet in 19    operation by January 1, 2018, in the first 3 full years of 20    that unit's operation; and21        (2) for any copollutant, the total average 22    tons-per-year of that copollutant emitted by the EGU or 23    large GHG-emitting unit either in the years 2018 through 24    2020 or, if the unit was not yet in operation by January 1, 25    2018, in the first 3 full years of that unit's operation. 26    "Green hydrogen" means a power plant technology in which   HB4798- 5 -LRB104 20250 TRT 33701 b1an EGU creates electric power exclusively from electrolytic 2hydrogen, in a manner that produces zero carbon and 3copollutant emissions, using hydrogen fuel that is 4electrolyzed using a 100% renewable zero carbon emission 5energy source.6    "Large greenhouse gas-emitting unit" or "large 7GHG-emitting unit" means a unit that is an electric generating 8unit or other fossil fuel-fired unit that itself has a 9nameplate capacity or serves a generator that has a nameplate 10capacity greater than 25 MWe and that produces electricity, 11including, but not limited to, coal-fired, coal-derived, 12oil-fired, natural gas-fired, and cogeneration units.13    "NOx emission rate" means the plant annual NOx total output 14emission rate as measured by the United States Environmental 15Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation Resource 16Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor, in the most 17recent year for which data is available.18    "Public greenhouse gas-emitting units" or "public 19GHG-emitting unit" means large greenhouse gas-emitting units, 20including EGUs, that are wholly owned, directly or indirectly, 21by one or more municipalities, municipal corporations, joint 22municipal electric power agencies, electric cooperatives, or 23other governmental or nonprofit entities, whether organized 24and created under the laws of Illinois or another state.25    "SO2 emission rate" means the "plant annual SO2 total 26output emission rate" as measured by the United States   HB4798- 6 -LRB104 20250 TRT 33701 b1Environmental Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation 2Resource Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor, in the 3most recent year for which data is available.4    (g) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 5use coal or oil as a fuel and are not public GHG-emitting units 6shall permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to 7zero no later than January 1, 2030.8    (h) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 9use coal as a fuel and are public GHG-emitting units shall 10permanently reduce CO2e emissions to zero no later than 11December 31, 2045. Any source or plant with such units must 12also reduce their CO2e emissions by 45% from existing 13emissions by no later than January 1, 2035. If the emissions 14reduction requirement is not achieved by December 31, 2035, 15the plant shall retire one or more units or otherwise reduce 16its CO2e emissions by 45% from existing emissions by June 30, 172038.18    (i) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 19use gas as a fuel and are not public GHG-emitting units shall 20permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to zero, 21including through unit retirement or the use of 100% green 22hydrogen or other similar technology that is commercially 23proven to achieve zero carbon emissions, according to the 24following:25        (1) No later than January 1, 2030: all EGUs and large 26    greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a NOx emissions   HB4798- 7 -LRB104 20250 TRT 33701 b1    rate of greater than 0.12 lbs/MWh or a SO2 emission rate of 2    greater than 0.006 lb/MWh, and are located in or within 3 3    miles of an environmental justice community designated as 4    of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment eligible 5    community.6        (2) No later than January 1, 2040: all EGUs and large 7    greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a NOx emission 8    rate of greater than 0.12 lbs/MWh or a SO2 emission rate 9    greater than 0.006 lb/MWh, and are not located in or 10    within 3 miles of an environmental justice community 11    designated as of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment 12    eligible community. After January 1, 2035, each such EGU 13    and large greenhouse gas-emitting unit shall reduce its 14    CO2e emissions by at least 50% from its existing emissions 15    for CO2e, and shall be limited in operation to, on average, 16    6 hours or less per day, measured over a calendar year, and 17    shall not run for more than 24 consecutive hours except in 18    emergency conditions, as designated by a Regional 19    Transmission Organization or Independent System Operator.20        (3) No later than January 1, 2035: all EGUs and large 21    greenhouse gas-emitting units that began operation prior 22    to the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd 23    General Assembly and have a NOx emission rate of less than 24    or equal to 0.12 lb/MWh and a SO2 emission rate less than 25    or equal to 0.006 lb/MWh, and are located in or within 3 26    miles of an environmental justice community designated as   HB4798- 8 -LRB104 20250 TRT 33701 b1    of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment eligible 2    community. Each such EGU and large greenhouse gas-emitting 3    unit shall reduce its CO2e emissions by at least 50% from 4    its existing emissions for CO2e no later than January 1, 5    2030.6        (4) No later than January 1, 2040: All remaining EGUs 7    and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a heat 8    rate greater than or equal to 7000 BTU/kWh. Each such EGU 9    and Large greenhouse gas-emitting unit shall reduce its 10    CO2e emissions by at least 50% from its existing emissions 11    for CO2e no later than January 1, 2035.12        (5) No later than January 1, 2045: all remaining EGUs 13    and large greenhouse gas-emitting units. 14    (j) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 15use gas as a fuel and are public GHG-emitting units shall 16permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to zero, 17including through unit retirement or the use of 100% green 18hydrogen or other similar technology that is commercially 19proven to achieve zero carbon emissions by January 1, 2045.20    (k) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 21utilize combined heat and power or cogeneration technology 22shall permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to 23zero, including through unit retirement or the use of 100% 24green hydrogen or other similar technology that is 25commercially proven to achieve zero carbon emissions by 26January 1, 2045.  HB4798- 9 -LRB104 20250 TRT 33701 b1    (k-5) No EGU or large greenhouse gas-emitting unit that 2uses gas as a fuel and is not a public GHG-emitting unit may 3emit, in any 12-month period, CO2e or copollutants in excess of 4that unit's existing emissions for those pollutants. 5    (l) Notwithstanding subsections (g) through (k-5), large 6GHG-emitting units including EGUs may temporarily continue 7emitting CO2e and copollutants after any applicable deadline 8specified in any of subsections (g) through (k-5) if it has 9been determined, as described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of 10this subsection, that ongoing operation of the EGU is 11necessary to maintain power grid supply and reliability or 12ongoing operation of large GHG-emitting unit that is not an 13EGU is necessary to serve as an emergency backup to 14operations. Up to and including the occurrence of an emission 15reduction deadline under subsection (i), all EGUs and large 16GHG-emitting units must comply with the following terms:17        (1) if an EGU or large GHG-emitting unit that is a 18    participant in a regional transmission organization 19    intends to retire, it must submit documentation to the 20    appropriate regional transmission organization by the 21    appropriate deadline that meets all applicable regulatory 22    requirements necessary to obtain approval to permanently 23    cease operating the large GHG-emitting unit;24        (2) if any EGU or large GHG-emitting unit that is a 25    participant in a regional transmission organization 26    receives notice that the regional transmission   HB4798- 10 -LRB104 20250 TRT 33701 b1    organization has determined that continued operation of 2    the unit is required, the unit may continue operating 3    until the issue identified by the regional transmission 4    organization is resolved. The owner or operator of the 5    unit must cooperate with the regional transmission 6    organization in resolving the issue and must reduce its 7    emissions to zero, consistent with the requirements under 8    subsection (g), (h), (i), (j), (k), or (k-5), as 9    applicable, as soon as practicable when the issue 10    identified by the regional transmission organization is 11    resolved; and12        (3) any large GHG-emitting unit that is not a 13    participant in a regional transmission organization shall 14    be allowed to continue emitting CO2e and copollutants 15    after the zero-emission date specified in subsection (g), 16    (h), (i), (j), (k), or (k-5), as applicable, in the 17    capacity of an emergency backup unit if approved by the 18    Illinois Commerce Commission.19    (m) No variance, adjusted standard, or other regulatory 20relief otherwise available in this Act may be granted to the 21emissions reduction and elimination obligations in this 22Section.23    (n) By June 30 of each year, beginning in 2025, the Agency 24shall prepare and publish on its website a report setting 25forth the actual greenhouse gas emissions from individual 26units and the aggregate statewide emissions from all units for   HB4798- 11 -LRB104 20250 TRT 33701 b1the prior year.2    (o) Every 5 years beginning in 2025, the Environmental 3Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and Illinois 4Commerce Commission shall jointly prepare, and release 5publicly, a report to the General Assembly that examines the 6State's current progress toward its renewable energy resource 7development goals, the status of CO2e and copollutant 8emissions reductions, the current status and progress toward 9developing and implementing green hydrogen technologies, the 10current and projected status of electric resource adequacy and 11reliability throughout the State for the period beginning 5 12years ahead, and proposed solutions for any findings. The 13Environmental Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and 14Illinois Commerce Commission shall consult PJM 15Interconnection, LLC and Midcontinent Independent System 16Operator, Inc., or their respective successor organizations 17regarding forecasted resource adequacy and reliability needs, 18anticipated new generation interconnection, new transmission 19development or upgrades, and any announced large GHG-emitting 20unit closure dates and include this information in the report. 21The report shall be released publicly by no later than 22December 15 of the year it is prepared. If the Environmental 23Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and Illinois 24Commerce Commission jointly conclude in the report that the 25data from the regional grid operators, the pace of renewable 26energy development, the pace of development of energy storage   HB4798- 12 -LRB104 20250 TRT 33701 b1and demand response utilization, transmission capacity, and 2the CO2e and copollutant emissions reductions required by 3subsection (i) or (k-5) reasonably demonstrate that a resource 4adequacy shortfall will occur, including whether there will be 5sufficient in-state capacity to meet the zonal requirements of 6MISO Zone 4 or the PJM ComEd Zone, per the requirements of the 7regional transmission organizations, or that the regional 8transmission operators determine that a reliability violation 9will occur during the time frame the study is evaluating, then 10the Illinois Power Agency, in conjunction with the 11Environmental Protection Agency shall develop a plan to reduce 12or delay CO2e and copollutant emissions reductions 13requirements only to the extent and for the duration necessary 14to meet the resource adequacy and reliability needs of the 15State, including allowing any plants whose emission reduction 16deadline has been identified in the plan as creating a 17reliability concern to continue operating, including operating 18with reduced emissions or as emergency backup where 19appropriate. The plan shall also consider the use of renewable 20energy, energy storage, demand response, transmission 21development, or other strategies to resolve the identified 22resource adequacy shortfall or reliability violation.23        (1) In developing the plan, the Environmental 24    Protection Agency and the Illinois Power Agency shall hold 25    at least one workshop open to, and accessible at a time and 26    place convenient to, the public and shall consider any   HB4798- 13 -LRB104 20250 TRT 33701 b1    comments made by stakeholders or the public. Upon 2    development of the plan, copies of the plan shall be 3    posted and made publicly available on the Environmental 4    Protection Agency's, the Illinois Power Agency's, and the 5    Illinois Commerce Commission's websites. All interested 6    parties shall have 60 days following the date of posting 7    to provide comment to the Environmental Protection Agency 8    and the Illinois Power Agency on the plan. All comments 9    submitted to the Environmental Protection Agency and the 10    Illinois Power Agency shall be encouraged to be specific, 11    supported by data or other detailed analyses, and, if 12    objecting to all or a portion of the plan, accompanied by 13    specific alternative wording or proposals. All comments 14    shall be posted on the Environmental Protection Agency's, 15    the Illinois Power Agency's, and the Illinois Commerce 16    Commission's websites. Within 30 days following the end of 17    the 60-day review period, the Environmental Protection 18    Agency and the Illinois Power Agency shall revise the plan 19    as necessary based on the comments received and file its 20    revised plan with the Illinois Commerce Commission for 21    approval.22        (2) Within 60 days after the filing of the revised 23    plan at the Illinois Commerce Commission, any person 24    objecting to the plan shall file an objection with the 25    Illinois Commerce Commission. Within 30 days after the 26    expiration of the comment period, the Illinois Commerce   HB4798- 14 -LRB104 20250 TRT 33701 b1    Commission shall determine whether an evidentiary hearing 2    is necessary. The Illinois Commerce Commission shall also 3    host 3 public hearings within 90 days after the plan is 4    filed. Following the evidentiary and public hearings, the 5    Illinois Commerce Commission shall enter its order 6    approving or approving with modifications the reliability 7    mitigation plan within 180 days.8        (3) The Illinois Commerce Commission shall only 9    approve the plan if the Illinois Commerce Commission 10    determines that it will resolve the resource adequacy or 11    reliability deficiency identified in the reliability 12    mitigation plan at the least amount of CO2e and copollutant 13    emissions, taking into consideration the emissions impacts 14    on environmental justice communities, and that it will 15    ensure adequate, reliable, affordable, efficient, and 16    environmentally sustainable electric service at the lowest 17    total cost over time, taking into account the impact of 18    increases in emissions.19        (4) If the resource adequacy or reliability deficiency 20    identified in the reliability mitigation plan is resolved 21    or reduced, the Environmental Protection Agency and the 22    Illinois Power Agency may file an amended plan adjusting 23    the reduction or delay in CO2e and copollutant emission 24    reduction requirements identified in the plan. 25(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21; 102-1031, eff. 5-27-22.)   HB4798- 15 -LRB104 20250 TRT 33701 b1    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-458)2    Sec. 9.15. Greenhouse gases.3    (a) An air pollution construction permit shall not be 4required due to emissions of greenhouse gases if the 5equipment, site, or source is not subject to regulation, as 6defined by 40 CFR 52.21, as now or hereafter amended, for 7greenhouse gases or is otherwise not addressed in this Section 8or by the Board in regulations for greenhouse gases. These 9exemptions do not relieve an owner or operator from the 10obligation to comply with other applicable rules or 11regulations.12    (b) An air pollution operating permit shall not be 13required due to emissions of greenhouse gases if the 14equipment, site, or source is not subject to regulation, as 15defined by Section 39.5 of this Act, for greenhouse gases or is 16otherwise not addressed in this Section or by the Board in 17regulations for greenhouse gases. These exemptions do not 18relieve an owner or operator from the obligation to comply 19with other applicable rules or regulations.20    (c) (Blank). 21    (d) (Blank).22    (e) (Blank). 23    (f) As used in this Section:24    "Battery storage resource" means any device or assembly of 25devices that is (i) either installed as a stand-alone system 26or tied to a power generation system, (ii) used for the primary   HB4798- 16 -LRB104 20250 TRT 33701 b1purpose of storing energy for wholesale or retail sale and not 2primarily for storage to later consume on the property on 3which the device resides, and (iii) an energy storage system, 4as defined in Section 16-135 of the Public Utilities Act. 5    "Carbon dioxide emission" means the plant annual CO2 total 6output emission as measured by the United States Environmental 7Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation Resource 8Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor. 9    "Carbon dioxide equivalent emissions" or "CO2e" means the 10sum total of the mass amount of emissions in tons per year, 11calculated by multiplying the mass amount of each of the 6 12greenhouse gases specified in Section 3.207, in tons per year, 13by its associated global warming potential as set forth in 40 14CFR 98, subpart A, table A-1 or its successor, and then adding 15them all together.16    "Cogeneration" or "combined heat and power" refers to any 17system that, either simultaneously or sequentially, produces 18electricity and useful thermal energy from a single fuel 19source.20    "Copollutants" refers to the 6 criteria pollutants that 21have been identified by the United States Environmental 22Protection Agency pursuant to the Clean Air Act.23    "Electric generating unit" or "EGU" means a fossil 24fuel-fired stationary boiler, combustion turbine, or combined 25cycle system that serves a generator that has a nameplate 26capacity greater than 25 MWe and produces electricity for   HB4798- 17 -LRB104 20250 TRT 33701 b1sale.2    "Environmental justice community" means the definition of 3that term based on existing methodologies and findings, used 4and as may be updated by the Illinois Power Agency and its 5program administrator in the Illinois Solar for All Program.6    "Equity investment eligible community" or "eligible 7community" means the geographic areas throughout Illinois that 8would most benefit from equitable investments by the State 9designed to combat discrimination and foster sustainable 10economic growth. Specifically, eligible community means the 11following areas:12        (1) areas where residents have been historically 13    excluded from economic opportunities, including 14    opportunities in the energy sector, as defined as R3 areas 15    pursuant to Section 10-40 of the Cannabis Regulation and 16    Tax Act; and17        (2) areas where residents have been historically 18    subject to disproportionate burdens of pollution, 19    including pollution from the energy sector, as established 20    by environmental justice communities as defined by the 21    Illinois Power Agency pursuant to the Illinois Power 22    Agency Act, excluding any racial or ethnic indicators.23    "Equity investment eligible person" or "eligible person" 24means the persons who would most benefit from equitable 25investments by the State designed to combat discrimination and 26foster sustainable economic growth. Specifically, eligible   HB4798- 18 -LRB104 20250 TRT 33701 b1person means the following people:2        (1) persons whose primary residence is in an equity 3    investment eligible community;4        (2) persons whose primary residence is in a 5    municipality, or a county with a population under 100,000, 6    where the closure of an electric generating unit or mine 7    has been publicly announced or the electric generating 8    unit or mine is in the process of closing or closed within 9    the last 5 years;10        (3) persons who are graduates of or currently enrolled 11    in the foster care system; or12        (4) persons who were formerly incarcerated.13    "Existing emissions" means: 14        (1) for CO2e, the total average tons-per-year of CO2e 15    emitted by the EGU or large GHG-emitting unit either in 16    the years 2018 through 2020 or, if the unit was not yet in 17    operation by January 1, 2018, in the first 3 full years of 18    that unit's operation; and19        (2) for any copollutant, the total average 20    tons-per-year of that copollutant emitted by the EGU or 21    large GHG-emitting unit either in the years 2018 through 22    2020 or, if the unit was not yet in operation by January 1, 23    2018, in the first 3 full years of that unit's operation. 24    "Green hydrogen" means a power plant technology in which 25an EGU creates electric power exclusively from electrolytic 26hydrogen, in a manner that produces zero carbon and   HB4798- 19 -LRB104 20250 TRT 33701 b1copollutant emissions, using hydrogen fuel that is 2electrolyzed using a 100% renewable zero carbon emission 3energy source.4    "Large greenhouse gas-emitting unit" or "large 5GHG-emitting unit" means a unit that is an electric generating 6unit or other fossil fuel-fired unit that itself has a 7nameplate capacity or serves a generator that has a nameplate 8capacity greater than 25 MWe and that produces electricity, 9including, but not limited to, coal-fired, coal-derived, 10oil-fired, natural gas-fired, and cogeneration units.11    "NOx emission rate" means the plant annual NOx total output 12emission rate as measured by the United States Environmental 13Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation Resource 14Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor, in the most 15recent year for which data is available.16    "Public greenhouse gas-emitting units" or "public 17GHG-emitting unit" means large greenhouse gas-emitting units, 18including EGUs, that are wholly owned, directly or indirectly, 19by one or more municipalities, municipal corporations, joint 20municipal electric power agencies, electric cooperatives, or 21other governmental or nonprofit entities, whether organized 22and created under the laws of Illinois or another state.23    "SO2 emission rate" means the "plant annual SO2 total 24output emission rate" as measured by the United States 25Environmental Protection Agency in its Emissions & Generation 26Resource Integrated Database (eGrid), or its successor, in the   HB4798- 20 -LRB104 20250 TRT 33701 b1most recent year for which data is available.2    "Total State-installed generation capacity" means the 3electric power industry capacity in Illinois by primary energy 4source as of September 15, 2021, as published by the United 5States Energy Information Administration.6    (g) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 7use coal or oil as a fuel and are not public GHG-emitting units 8shall permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to 9zero no later than January 1, 2030.10    (h) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 11use coal as a fuel and are public GHG-emitting units shall 12permanently reduce CO2e emissions to zero no later than 13December 31, 2045. Any source or plant with such units must 14also reduce their CO2e emissions by 45% from existing 15emissions by no later than January 1, 2035. If the emissions 16reduction requirement is not achieved by December 31, 2035, 17the plant shall retire one or more units or otherwise reduce 18its CO2e emissions by 45% from existing emissions by June 30, 192038.20    (i) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 21use gas as a fuel and are not public GHG-emitting units shall 22permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to zero, 23including through unit retirement or the use of 100% green 24hydrogen or other similar technology that is commercially 25proven to achieve zero carbon emissions, according to the 26following:  HB4798- 21 -LRB104 20250 TRT 33701 b1        (1) No later than January 1, 2030: all EGUs and large 2    greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a NOx emissions 3    rate of greater than 0.12 lbs/MWh or a SO2 emission rate of 4    greater than 0.006 lb/MWh, and are located in or within 3 5    miles of an environmental justice community designated as 6    of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment eligible 7    community.8        (2) No later than January 1, 2040: all EGUs and large 9    greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a NOx emission 10    rate of greater than 0.12 lbs/MWh or a SO2 emission rate 11    greater than 0.006 lb/MWh, and are not located in or 12    within 3 miles of an environmental justice community 13    designated as of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment 14    eligible community. After January 1, 2035, each such EGU 15    and large greenhouse gas-emitting unit shall reduce its 16    CO2e emissions by at least 50% from its existing emissions 17    for CO2e, and shall be limited in operation to, on average, 18    6 hours or less per day, measured over a calendar year, and 19    shall not run for more than 24 consecutive hours except in 20    emergency conditions, as designated by a Regional 21    Transmission Organization or Independent System Operator.22        (3) No later than January 1, 2035: all EGUs and large 23    greenhouse gas-emitting units that began operation prior 24    to the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd 25    General Assembly and have a NOx emission rate of less than 26    or equal to 0.12 lb/MWh and a SO2 emission rate less than   HB4798- 22 -LRB104 20250 TRT 33701 b1    or equal to 0.006 lb/MWh, and are located in or within 3 2    miles of an environmental justice community designated as 3    of January 1, 2021 or an equity investment eligible 4    community. Each such EGU and large greenhouse gas-emitting 5    unit shall reduce its CO2e emissions by at least 50% from 6    its existing emissions for CO2e no later than January 1, 7    2030.8        (4) No later than January 1, 2040: All remaining EGUs 9    and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that have a heat 10    rate greater than or equal to 7000 BTU/kWh. Each such EGU 11    and Large greenhouse gas-emitting unit shall reduce its 12    CO2e emissions by at least 50% from its existing emissions 13    for CO2e no later than January 1, 2035.14        (5) No later than January 1, 2045: all remaining EGUs 15    and large greenhouse gas-emitting units. 16    (j) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 17use gas as a fuel and are public GHG-emitting units shall 18permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to zero, 19including through unit retirement or the use of 100% green 20hydrogen or other similar technology that is commercially 21proven to achieve zero carbon emissions by January 1, 2045.22    (k) All EGUs and large greenhouse gas-emitting units that 23utilize combined heat and power or cogeneration technology 24shall permanently reduce all CO2e and copollutant emissions to 25zero, including through unit retirement or the use of 100% 26green hydrogen or other similar technology that is   HB4798- 23 -LRB104 20250 TRT 33701 b1commercially proven to achieve zero carbon emissions by 2January 1, 2045.3    (k-5) Except as provided in subsection (m) of this 4Section, no No EGU or large greenhouse gas-emitting unit that 5uses gas as a fuel and is not a public GHG-emitting unit may 6emit, in any 12-month period, CO2e or copollutants in excess of 7that unit's existing emissions for those pollutants. 8    (l) Notwithstanding subsections (g) through (k-5), large 9GHG-emitting units including EGUs may temporarily continue 10emitting CO2e and copollutants after any applicable deadline 11specified in any of subsections (g) through (k-5) if it has 12been determined, as described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of 13this subsection, that ongoing operation of the EGU is 14necessary to maintain power grid supply and reliability or 15ongoing operation of large GHG-emitting unit that is not an 16EGU is necessary to serve as an emergency backup to 17operations. Up to and including the occurrence of an emission 18reduction deadline under subsection (i), all EGUs and large 19GHG-emitting units must comply with the following terms:20        (1) if an EGU or large GHG-emitting unit that is a 21    participant in a regional transmission organization 22    intends to retire, it must submit documentation to the 23    appropriate regional transmission organization by the 24    appropriate deadline that meets all applicable regulatory 25    requirements necessary to obtain approval to permanently 26    cease operating the large GHG-emitting unit;  HB4798- 24 -LRB104 20250 TRT 33701 b1        (2) if any EGU or large GHG-emitting unit that is a 2    participant in a regional transmission organization 3    receives notice that the regional transmission 4    organization has determined that an emergency, 5    pre-emergency, or conservative operations situation exists 6    or that continued operation of the unit is required, the 7    unit may continue operating until the issue identified by 8    the regional transmission organization is resolved. The 9    owner or operator of the unit must cooperate with the 10    regional transmission organization in resolving the issue 11    and must reduce its emissions to zero, consistent with the 12    requirements under subsection (g), (h), (i), (j), (k), or 13    (k-5), as applicable, as soon as practicable when the 14    issue identified by the regional transmission organization 15    is resolved; and16        (3) any large GHG-emitting unit that is not a 17    participant in a regional transmission organization shall 18    be allowed to continue emitting CO2e and copollutants 19    after the zero-emission date specified in subsection (g), 20    (h), (i), (j), (k), or (k-5), as applicable, in the 21    capacity of an emergency backup unit if approved by the 22    Illinois Commerce Commission.23    (m) No variance, adjusted standard, or other regulatory 24relief otherwise available in this Act may be granted to the 25emissions reduction and elimination obligations in this 26Section if battery storage resources constitute at least 10%   HB4798- 25 -LRB104 20250 TRT 33701 b1of the total State-installed generation capacity in the State. 2If battery storage resources constitute less than 10% of the 3total State-installed generation capacity at any time after 4the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 5Assembly, the Agency shall delay enforcement of the timelines 6in paragraphs (1) through (5) of subsection (i) and relieve 7generators of their obligation not to exceed their existing 8emission levels, as described in subsection (k-5). For a large 9GHG-emitting unit that uses gas as a fuel and is subject to the 10restrictions of subsection (k-5) of this Section, the unit may 11exceed its existing emissions during run hours dispatched by a 12regional transmission organization during emergency, 13pre-emergency, or conservative operations or run hours that 14are required to maintain system reliability.15    (n) By June 30 of each year, beginning in 2025, the Agency 16shall prepare and publish on its website a report setting 17forth the actual greenhouse gas emissions from individual 18units and the aggregate statewide emissions from all units for 19the prior year.20    (o) The Environmental Protection Agency, Illinois Power 21Agency, and Illinois Commerce Commission shall jointly 22prepare, and release publicly, a report to the General 23Assembly that examines the State's current progress toward its 24renewable energy resource development goals, the status of 25CO2e and copollutant emissions reductions, the current status 26and progress toward developing and implementing green hydrogen   HB4798- 26 -LRB104 20250 TRT 33701 b1technologies, the current and projected status of electric 2resource adequacy and reliability throughout the State for the 3period beginning 5 years ahead, and proposed solutions for any 4findings. The Environmental Protection Agency, Illinois Power 5Agency, and Illinois Commerce Commission shall consult PJM 6Interconnection, LLC and Midcontinent Independent System 7Operator, Inc., or their respective successor organizations 8regarding forecasted resource adequacy and reliability needs, 9anticipated new generation interconnection, new transmission 10development or upgrades, and any announced large GHG-emitting 11unit closure dates and include this information in the report. 12The report shall be released publicly by no later than 13December 15 of the year it is prepared. If the Environmental 14Protection Agency, Illinois Power Agency, and Illinois 15Commerce Commission jointly conclude in the report that the 16data from the regional grid operators, the pace of renewable 17energy development, the pace of development of energy storage 18and demand response utilization, transmission capacity, and 19the CO2e and copollutant emissions reductions required by 20subsection (i) or (k-5) reasonably demonstrate that a resource 21adequacy shortfall will occur, including whether there will be 22sufficient in-state capacity to meet the zonal requirements of 23MISO Zone 4 or the PJM ComEd Zone, per the requirements of the 24regional transmission organizations, or that the regional 25transmission operators determine that a reliability violation 26will occur during the time frame the study is evaluating, then   HB4798- 27 -LRB104 20250 TRT 33701 b1the Illinois Power Agency, in conjunction with the 2Environmental Protection Agency shall develop a plan to reduce 3or delay CO2e and copollutant emissions reductions 4requirements only to the extent and for the duration necessary 5to meet the resource adequacy and reliability needs of the 6State, including allowing any plants whose emission reduction 7deadline has been identified in the plan as creating a 8reliability concern to continue operating, including operating 9with reduced emissions or as emergency backup where 10appropriate. The plan shall also consider the use of renewable 11energy, energy storage, demand response, transmission 12development, or other strategies to resolve the identified 13resource adequacy shortfall or reliability violation.14        (1) In developing the plan, the Environmental 15    Protection Agency and the Illinois Power Agency shall hold 16    at least one workshop open to, and accessible at a time and 17    place convenient to, the public and shall consider any 18    comments made by stakeholders or the public. Upon 19    development of the plan, copies of the plan shall be 20    posted and made publicly available on the Environmental 21    Protection Agency's, the Illinois Power Agency's, and the 22    Illinois Commerce Commission's websites. All interested 23    parties shall have 60 days following the date of posting 24    to provide comment to the Environmental Protection Agency 25    and the Illinois Power Agency on the plan. All comments 26    submitted to the Environmental Protection Agency and the   HB4798- 28 -LRB104 20250 TRT 33701 b1    Illinois Power Agency shall be encouraged to be specific, 2    supported by data or other detailed analyses, and, if 3    objecting to all or a portion of the plan, accompanied by 4    specific alternative wording or proposals. All comments 5    shall be posted on the Environmental Protection Agency's, 6    the Illinois Power Agency's, and the Illinois Commerce 7    Commission's websites. Within 30 days following the end of 8    the 60-day review period, the Environmental Protection 9    Agency and the Illinois Power Agency shall revise the plan 10    as necessary based on the comments received and file its 11    revised plan with the Illinois Commerce Commission for 12    approval.13        (2) Within 60 days after the filing of the revised 14    plan at the Illinois Commerce Commission, any person 15    objecting to the plan shall file an objection with the 16    Illinois Commerce Commission. Within 30 days after the 17    expiration of the comment period, the Illinois Commerce 18    Commission shall determine whether an evidentiary hearing 19    is necessary. The Illinois Commerce Commission shall also 20    host 3 public hearings within 90 days after the plan is 21    filed. Following the evidentiary and public hearings, the 22    Illinois Commerce Commission shall enter its order 23    approving or approving with modifications the reliability 24    mitigation plan within 180 days.25        (3) The Illinois Commerce Commission shall only 26    approve the plan if the Illinois Commerce Commission   HB4798- 29 -LRB104 20250 TRT 33701 b1    determines that it will resolve the resource adequacy or 2    reliability deficiency identified in the reliability 3    mitigation plan at the least amount of CO2e and copollutant 4    emissions, taking into consideration the emissions impacts 5    on environmental justice communities, and that it will 6    ensure adequate, reliable, affordable, efficient, and 7    environmentally sustainable electric service at the lowest 8    total cost over time, taking into account the impact of 9    increases in emissions.10        (4) If the resource adequacy or reliability deficiency 11    identified in the reliability mitigation plan is resolved 12    or reduced, the Environmental Protection Agency and the 13    Illinois Power Agency may file an amended plan adjusting 14    the reduction or delay in CO2e and copollutant emission 15    reduction requirements identified in the plan. 16    (p) The Agency shall adopt rules implementing this Section 17no later than July 1, 2027. 18(Source: P.A. 104-458, eff. 6-1-26.) 19    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 20changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 21that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 22represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 23not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 24made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 25Public Act.   HB4798- 30 -LRB104 20250 TRT 33701 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.